Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2329.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1306(c), 1308(g)(1)(ii) and 1306-D(c) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 1306. Voting by Absentee Electors.--* * *(c) [Except as provided under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot), a] A completed absentee ballot must be received in the office of the county board of elections no later 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 than [eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the primary or election.] five o'clock P.M. on the seventh day following the day of the primary or election. If, at the time of completing the absentee ballot, the elector declared under penalty of perjury that the ballot was timely submitted, the ballot may not be rejected on the basis that it has a late postmark, an unreadable postmark or no postmark.Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--* * *(g) (1) * * *(ii) An absentee ballot cast by any absentee elector as defined in section 1301(i), (j), (k), (l), (m) and (n), an absentee ballot under section [1302(a.3)] 1302.1(a.3) or a mail-in ballot cast by a mail-in elector shall be canvassed in accordance with this subsection if the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is received in the office of the county board of elections no later than [eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the primary or election.] five o'clock P.M. on the seventh day following the day of the primary or election. If, at the time of completing the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, the elector declared under penalty of perjury that the ballot was timely submitted, the ballot may not be rejected on the basis that it has a late postmark, an unreadable postmark or no postmark.* * *Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.* * *(c) Deadline.--[Except as provided under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot), a] A completed mail-in ballot must be received in the office of the county board of elections no later than [eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the 20260HB2329PN3104 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 primary or election.] five o'clock P.M. on the seventh day following the day of the primary or election. If, at the time of completing the mail-in ballot, the elector declared under penalty of perjury that the ballot was timely submitted, the ballot may not be rejected on the basis that it has a late postmark, an unreadable postmark or no postmark.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2329PN3104 - 3 - 1234567